Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.010

Authority of courts to render.

Courts of record within their respective jurisdictions shall have power to declare rights, status and other legal relations whether or not further relief is or could be claimed. An action or proceeding shall not be open to objection on the ground that a declaratory judgment or decree is prayed for. The declaration may be either affirmative or negative in form and effect; and such declarations shall have the force and effect of a final judgment or decree.

[ 1937 c 14 s 1; 1935 c 113 s 1; RRS s 784-1.]